Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-952
State colleges; programs permitted; limitations.

The state colleges may continue to deliver academic transfer and preprofessional associate degree programs for which a degree may be awarded if approved by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414 upon demonstration of compelling need and unique capacity of the state colleges to offer such programs. The state colleges shall not independently award the associate degree, diploma, or certificate for applied technology education programs.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 96;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 14.